dictionaries/uk/index.dic
бліднути/Zyt
брезкнути/Zyt
вбити/Zl
ввергти/Z
ввібратися/Z
ввігнатися/Z
ввіссатися/Z
вдати/Z
вдіти/Z
вдягти/Z
вибити/Zl
вибліднути/Z
вигаснути/Z
видатися/Z
видохти/Z
вимерзти/Z
вимолотися/Z
випити/Zl
випродати/Z'
вислати/X'Z
висохти/Z
вистати/Z
вити/ZytYO
витрухнути/Z
витягтися/Z
вихолонутися/Z
вичовгти/Z
відбити/Zl
відвикнути/Z
відвологти/Z
віддати/Z'
відібрати/Z'
відігнати/Z'
відідрати/Z'
відіпрати/Z'
відіссати/Z'
відлипнути/Z
відлитися/Z
відмерзнути/Z
відмокнути/Z
відпитися/Z
відпродати/Z'
відсохнути/Z
відтанути/Z
відтягти/Z
відхотіти/Z
вкиснути/Z
вклякти/Z
влити/Zl
вмерзнути/Z
вмокнути/Zl
вмолотися/Z
впити/Z^
вповити/Zl
всісти/Z
всохнутися/Z
встати/Z
встрягти/Z
втиснути/ZNl
втихнути/Z
втухнути/Z
втягтися/Z
гаснути/Zyt
глухнути/Zyt
гнатися/Zy
гуснути/Zyt
датися/Z
дістатися/Z
дітися/Z
добитися/Z
довити/Zl
додати/Z'
докиснути/Z
допити/Zl
дорозпродати/Z'
досохти/Z
доссатися/Z
достигти/Z
дотанути/Z
дотиснутися/Z
дотягтися/Z
жовкнути/Zyt
забити/Zl
заблиснути/Z
зав'язнути/Z
зав'яти/Z
завдатися/Z
зависнути/Z
завитися/Z
заглухнути/Z
загудіти/Z
загуснути/Z
задатися/Z
задітися/Z
зажовкнути/Z
закиснути/Z
закоцюбти/Z
замерзти/Z
замовкти/Z
замолоти/Z
запити/Zl
заподітися/Z
запрагти/Z
заприсягтися/Z
запродатися/Z
запухти/Z
засісти/Z
заслати/X'Z
засохти/Z
зассатися/Z
застигти/Z
застряти/Z
затверднути/Z
затиснути/ZNl
затихнути/Z
затягти/Z
захляти/Z
захотіти/Z
захряснути/Z
зачахнути/Z
зашкарубнути/Z
збитися/Z
зблякнути/Z
звергтися/Z
звикнутися/Z
звити/Zl
згаснути/Z
здати/Z'
здогнати/Z
зібрати/Z'
зів'яти/Z
зідрати/Z'
зіссати/Z
злити/XLytZl
зм'якнути/Z
змерзнутися/Z
змерзтися/Z
змеркти/Z
змовкнути/Z
змокти/Z
зникнути/Z
зодягтися/Z
зсісти/Z
зсохнути/Z
зсохти/Z
зустріти/Zl
ізслизнути/Z
киснути/Zyt
липнути/Zyt
мерзти/Z
мерхнути/Zyt
мокнути/Zyt
набити/Zl
набриднути/Z
набухнути/Z
нависнути/Z
навитися/Z
надатися/Z
надбитися/Z
надібрати/Z'
надіти/Zl
надлити/Zl
надсісти/Z
надсохнути/Z
накиснути/Z
намерзти/Z
намокнути/Z
напитися/Z
напосістися/Z
наревітися/Z
насістися/Z
насохнути/Z
нассатися/Z
настигти/Z
натягти/Z
нахолонути/Z
недопити/Zl
недопродати/Z'
нишкнути/Zy
оббитися/Z
обвикнутися/Z
обвити/Zl
обдати/Z'
обібрати/Z'
обігнати/Z'
обідрати/Z'
обіпрати/Z'
обкиснути/Z
облитися/Z
обмерзти/Z
обрезкнути/Z
обсісти/Z
обсохнути/Z
обтанути/Z
обтиснутися/Z
обтягтися/Z
оглухнути/Z
одбитися/Z
одібрати/Z'
одіти/Zl
одпити/Zl
одтанути/Z
одягтися/Z
оповити/Zl
опосісти/Z
опухнути/Z
осістися/Z
ослизнути/Z
остатися/Z
остогиднути/Z
отерпти/Z
отягтися/Z
охолонути/Z
пахнути/Zyt
перебитися/Z
перевдягтися/Z
перевидатися/Z
перевити/Zl
перегаснути/Z
перегудіти/Z
передатися/Z
передрати/Z'
передягти/Z
пережовкнути/Z
перездатися/Z
перезібратися/Z
перемокти/Z
переодягти/Z
перепити/Zl
переповити/Zl
переподати/Z'
перепродати/Z'
пересістися/Z
пересохти/Z
перестигнути/Z
перестрітися/Z
перетягти/Z
перехолонути/Z
пити/Zytl
підбитися/Z
підвити/Zl
піддати/Z'
піддягти/Z
підібратися/Z
підігнатися/Z
підлипнути/Z
підлитися/Z
підмокнути/Z
підпухнути/Z
підсохнути/Z
підтанути/Z
підтиснутися/Z
підтягтися/Z
побитися/Z
поблякнути/Z
повергнути/ZlN
повити/ZlY
повстати/Z
погіркнути/Z
погудіти/Z
податися/Z
подітися/Z
пожовкнути/Z
позостатися/Z
померзти/Z
померхти/Z
поникнути/Z
попобити/Zl
попогудіти/Z
попопити/Z
попухнути/Z
посісти/Z
посліпти/Z
посохнути/Z
поссати/Z
постатися/Z
посягти/Z
потерпти/Z
потиснутися/Z
потягти/Z
похолонути/Z
почахнути/Z
прагнути/Zyt
прибитися/Z
пригаснути/Z
приклякти/Z
примерхнути/Z
приодягтися/Z
присістися/Z
приссатися/Z
присягти/Z
притихнути/Z
притягтися/Z
пробитися/Z
продати/Z'
промерзти/Z
пропахти/Z
просісти/Z
простягтися/Z
протиснутися/Z
прохолонути/Z
розбити/Zl
розвити/Zl
роздягти/Z
розігнати/Z'
розіслати/X'Z
розлитися/Z
розмокти/Z
розповити/Zl
розпухнути/Z
розстатися/Z
розтягти/Z
сісти/Z
слабнути/Zyt
сліпнути/Zyt
сперти/Zl
спити/Zl
спочити/Z
спухнути/Z
стати/Z
стерти/Zl
стиснутися/Z
стухнути/Z
схотіти/Z
тверднути/Zyt
тихнути/Zyt
убити/Zl
увиснути/Z
увібратися/Z
угрузнути/Z
удягти/Z
улипнути/Z
уникнути/Zl
уповитися/Z
усохти/Z
устряти/Z
утягтися/Z
холонути/Zyt
шерхнути/Z
